latin_to_cyrillic.foma
# Copyright (C) 2023 Darko Milosevic  <daremc86@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, version 3.0 of the License.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define SimpleLatinSrp 
a : а | 
b : б | 
v : в | 
g : г | 
d : д | 
đ : ђ | 
e : е | 
ž : ж | 
z : з | 
i : и | 
j : ј | 
k : к | 
l : л | 
m : м | 
n : н | 
o : о | 
p : п | 
r : р | 
s : с | 
t : т | 
ć : ћ | 
u : у | 
f : ф | 
h : х | 
c : ц | 
č : ч | 
š : ш -> || _;

# digraph system
define DigraphLatinSrp 
{lj} : љ |
{nj} : њ |
{dž} : џ @-> || _;


define OtherEnglishLatinSrp 
q : к | 
x : {кс} |
y : ј |
w : в -> || _; 

define MontenegrinLatin 
ź : [з ј] |
ś : [с ј] -> || _; 

#  LatinConvertLSeq  omits specially named English latin letters.
# THis will be usd in Letter sequence. Other latin letters will be given cyrillic names
define LatinConvertLSeq  
DigraphLatinSrp 
 .o. SimpleLatinSrp 
; 
# This rule adds in phonetic transcription for word speech
define LatinConvert  
  LatinConvertLSeq
 .o.  OtherEnglishLatinSrp
 .o.  MontenegrinLatin
; 
